Maine, session 132, LD611.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1484, sub-§3, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 627, §33, is
further amended to read:
A. The excise tax on a motor vehicle owned by an individual resident of this State
must be paid in the place where the owner resides. If the individual resident of this
State does not have a residing place, the excise tax may be paid directly to the Secretary
of State if:
(1) The motor vehicle was previously registered in this State to the individual
resident;
(2) The Secretary of State confirms with the municipality where the individual
resides that the municipality refused to receive the excise tax of the individual who
does not have a residing place; and
(3) The individual resident holds a license pursuant to Title 29-A, section 1251.
Page 1 - 132LR1723(03)